Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1219
Revenue bonds; form; denominations; place of payment; powers of city.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall provide the form of any bonds issued pursuant to section 14-1217, including coupons to be attached to such bonds to evidence interest payments, which bonds shall be signed by the mayor and countersigned and registered by the city comptroller, under the city's seal, and which coupons shall bear the facsimile signature of such mayor and the city clerk, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of such bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest of such bonds which may be at the office of the city treasurer or any bank or trust company in the State of Nebraska. All bonds authorized by sections 14-1215 to 14-1217 and 14-1223 shall be and shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the state without, however, constituting the revenue bonds authorized in such sections an indebtedness of the city issuing such bonds. The city council may provide for the registration of such bonds in the name of the owner as to the principal alone or as to both principal and interest.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 619;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 108;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1219;

Laws 1971, LB 4, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 252.
July 21, 2022